Utah statutes.
78B-1-116.   Jurors -- Employer not to discharge or threaten employee for jury service -- Criminal penalty -- Civil action by employee.

(1)  An employer may not deprive an employee of employment, threaten or take any adverse employment action, or otherwise coerce the employee regarding employment because the employee receives a summons, responds to it, serves as a juror, or a grand juror, or attends court for prospective jury or grand jury service.

(2)  An employee may not be required or requested to use annual, vacation, or sick leave for time spent responding to a summons for jury duty, time spent participating in the jury selection process, or for time spent actually serving on a jury.  Nothing in this provision shall be construed to require an employer to provide annual, vacation, or sick leave to employees under the provisions of this statute who otherwise are not entitled to those benefits under company policies.

(3)  Any employer who violates this section is guilty of criminal contempt and upon conviction may be fined not more than $500 or imprisoned not more than six months, or both.

(4)  If any employer discharges an employee in violation of this section, the employee within 30 days may bring a civil action for recovery of wages lost as a result of the violation and for an order requiring the reinstatement of the employee.  Damages recoverable may not exceed lost wages for six weeks.  If the employee prevails, the employee shall be allowed reasonable attorney fees fixed by the court.

